NO.7 ENGINE STALLS-AFTER START/AT IDLE [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0103f1820500
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ENGINE STALLS‐AFTER START/AT IDLE |
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DESCRIPTION
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• Engine stops unexpectedly.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Poor fuel quality
• Intake-air system restriction or clogging
• Engine overheating
• A/C system improper operation
• Immobilizer system (PATS) and/or circuit malfunction (if equipped)
• PCM control relay malfunction
• Glow system malfunction
• Inadequate fuel pressure
• Fuel pressure sensor related circuit malfunction
• Suction control valve malfunction (built-in supply pump)
• Fuel pressure limiter malfunction (built-in common rail)
• Fuel leakage
• Fuel line clogging or restriction
• Fuel filter clogging or restriction
• Incorrect fuel injection timing
• Erratic signal from CKP sensor
• Erratic signal from CMP sensor
• Supply pump malfunction
• Fuel injector malfunction
• Low engine compression
• Improper valve timing
• Exhaust system and/or oxidation catalytic converter restriction or clogging
• EGR system malfunction
• ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
• Accelerator pedal positions (APP) sensor or related circuit malfunction
• MAF/IAT sensor or related circuit malfunction
• V-reference voltage supply circuit malfunction
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Diagnostic Procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
RESULTS |
ACTION |
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1
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Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Do the following conditions appear?
• Engine is not completely started.
• DTC P1260 is displayed.
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Yes
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Both conditions appear:
Go to Step 4.
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No
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Either or other condition appears:
Go to the next step.
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2
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Is the coil connector securely connected to coil?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Connect coil connector securely.
Return to Step 1.
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3
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Does the security light illuminate?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect instrument cluster and wiring harness.
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4
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Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2 and retrieve the DTCs.
DTC
B1213, B1342, B1600, B1601, B1602, B1681, B2103, B2431
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Yes
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Go to the appropriate DTC test.
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No
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Advanced keyless entry system is not equipped:
Go to the next step.
Advanced keyless entry system is equipped:
Go to Step 7.
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5
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Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
• Between coil terminal A and instrument cluster terminal 2Q
• Between coil terminal B and instrument cluster terminal 2S
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
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Yes
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Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
• Between PCM 95 and instrument cluster terminal 1I
• Between PCM terminal 87 and instrument cluster terminal 1K
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
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Yes
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Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
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No
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Go to Step 8.
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7
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Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
• Between keyless CM terminal 3Y and coil A
• Between keyless CM terminal 3AA and coil B
• Between keyless CM terminal 3W and PCM 87
• Between keyless CM terminal 3X and PCM 95
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
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Yes
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Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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Inspect the following:
• Fuel quality (e.g.: include water contamination, winter/summer blend)
• Fuel line/fuel filter clogging
• Intake-air system restriction
Are all items normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Service if necessary.
Repeat Step 8.
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9
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Is the engine overheating?
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Yes
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Go to symptom troubleshooting “NO.17 COOLING SYSTEM CONCERNS-OVERHEATING [MZR-CD (RF-Turbo)]”.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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10
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Disconnect the APP sensor connector.
Measure the voltage at the APP sensor connector VREF terminal (terminal D and A) and GND with turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Specification
4.5—5.5 V
Is voltage normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect PCM terminal 63 and 82 related circuit.
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11
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Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are any DTCs displayed?
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Yes
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DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect the following:
• Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 119 or 120
• Open circuit PCM control relay and PCM terminal 105
• PCM control relay stuck open
• Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 1, 2, 3, 114 or 117)
• Poor connection to vehicle body ground
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No
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No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
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12
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Does the engine start normally after warm-up?
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Yes
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Inspect the glow system operation.
(See RELAY INSPECTION.)
Replace any malfunctioning part if necessary.
If glow system is normal, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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13
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Is there any restriction in the exhaust system or oxidation catalytic converter?
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Yes
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Repair or replace if necessary.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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14
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Access the RPM PID.
Is the RPM PID indicating engine speed while cranking the engine?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Go to Step 19.
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15
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Connect the pressure gauge to the A/C line.
Turn the blower and A/C switches on.
Is pressure within the specifications?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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A/C is always on:
Go to the symptom troubleshooting “NO.26 A/C ALWAYS ON OR A/C COMPRESSOR RUNS CONTINUOUSLY [MZR-CD (RF-Turbo)]”.
Other symptoms:
Inspect the following:
• Refrigerant charging amount
• Cooling fan operation
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16
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Inspect the APP sensor.
Is the APP sensor normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace the accelerator pedal component.
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17
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Depress the accelerator pedal slightly.
Crank the engine.
Does the engine start now?
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Yes
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Inspect the idle speed.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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18
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Inspect the for fuel leakage from the fuel pipe.
Is any fuel leakage found on the fuel pipe?
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Yes
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Repair or replace if necessary.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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19
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Visually inspect the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel.
Are the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace malfunctioning parts.
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20
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Measure the gap between the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel.
Specification
1.5—2.5 mm {0.059—0.098 in}
Is the gap within the specification?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Adjust the CKP sensor position.
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21
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Visually inspect the CMP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel.
Are the CMP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel normal?
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Yes
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Inspect the following PIDs:
• ECT
• IAT
• MAF
• RPM
If the PID value is not as specified, repair or replace malfunctioning parts.
If the PID value is normal, go to the next step.
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No
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Replace malfunctioning parts.
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22
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Inspect the fuel pressure sensor.
Is the fuel pressure normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace the common rail.
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23
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Inspect suction control valve.
Is the suction control valve normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Replace the supply pump.
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24
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Is the engine compression correct?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect the following:
• Damaged valve seat
• Worn valve stem and valve guide
• Worn or stuck piston ring
• Worn piston, piston ring or cylinder
• Improper valve timing
Service if necessary.
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25
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Inspect the fuel injector.
Is the fuel injector normal?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace if necessary.
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26
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Inspect the EGR system operation.
Is the EGR system operation normal?
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Yes
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Remove and inspect the supply pump and common rail.
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No
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Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the EGR system operation results.
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27
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Verify test results.
• If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms.
• If the malfunction remains, inspect the related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
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